Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.900

Short title—Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 108.

RCW 41.56.010 through 41.56.900 and 41.06.150 shall be known as the "Public Employees' Collective Bargaining Act" and shall take effect on July 1, 1967.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 108 s 14.]